Ohio, session 136, HB666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3333.56 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3333.56. (A) The chancellor of higher education, in partnership with the Ohio federal research network, shall establish and administer the Ohio tech institute to strengthen Ohio's innovation ecosystem by streamlining access to federal technology, fostering cross-sector collaboration, and supporting funding opportunities for colleges and universities, businesses, and other partners. (B) The institute shall create and operate a statewide database and service platform available to any Ohio college and university, private company, nonprofit company, and government entity that chooses to participate. (C) The database created under division (B) of this section shall centralize and provide access to consolidated federal tech-transfer opportunities. The institute shall regularly distribute refined lists of available technologies to participating members. (D) For each technology, the institute shall facilitate introductions and partnerships between interested students, colleges, or universities and companies or organizations interested in commercialization or collaboration. The institute shall coordinate with participants when exploring further collaboration opportunities. (E) The institute, through the Ohio federal research network, shall provide coaching and support for participants seeking federal matching funding, including: (1) Small business innovation research programs; (2) Tactical funding increase programs; (3) Strategic funding increase programs.